src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-1E-vueqdhdhed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - vueʹđđed: # Verb 'to sleep/nukkua' - full paradigm
     vueʹđđed+V+Inf: vuẹʹđđed
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuäđam
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuäđak
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuäđđ
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuẹʹđđep
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuẹʹđđveʹted
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuäʹđˈđe
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: vuäʹđet
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuäʹđ
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vueʹđˈđem
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vueʹđˈđiǩ
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vueʹđi
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vueʹđim
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vueʹđid
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vueʹđˈđe
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: vueʹđˈđeš
     vueʹđđed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuäđđam
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Sg1: vuäʹđžem
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Sg2: vuäʹđžiǩ
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Sg3: vuäʹđež
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Pl1: vuäʹđžep
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Pl2: vuäʹđžid
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Pl3: vuäʹđže
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+Sg4: vuäʹđžet
     vueʹđđed+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuäʹđže
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Sg1: vuäđčem
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Sg2: vuäđčiǩ
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Sg3: vuäđči
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Pl1: vuäđčim
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Pl2: vuäđčid
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Pl3: vuäđče
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+Sg4: vuäđčeš
     vueʹđđed+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuäđče
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuäʹđ
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuäđas
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuẹʹđđep
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+Pl2: vuẹʹđđed
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuäđˈđaz
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+2+ConNeg: vuäʹđ
     vueʹđđed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuåđˈđu
     vueʹđđed+V+Actio+Ess: vuẹʹđđmen
     vueʹđđed+V+Actio: vuẹʹđđem
     vueʹđđed+V+Act+PrsPrc: vueʹđđi
     vueʹđđed+V+Act+PrfPrc: vuäđđam
     vueʹđđed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vuåđˈđum
     vueʹđđed+V+VAbess: vuäʹđǩâni
     vueʹđđed+V+GerTemp: vuäʹđeen
     vueʹđđed+V+GerInstr: vuäʹđeeʹl
     vueʹđđed+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: vuäˈʹđškuẹʹtted
